Indiana, session 2026, SB66.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-7-2-34.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 34.5. "Committee", for purposes of IC 12-17.2-3.8,
refers to the early learning advisory committee established by
IC 12-17.2-3.8-5.
SECTION 2. IC 12-7-2-122.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 122.2. "Kindergarten readiness
indicators", for purposes of IC 12-17.2-3.8, means a concise set of
age banded, research based descriptions of skills and behaviors
from birth through five (5) years of age in the domains of:
(1) behavioral well-being development;
(2) approaches to learning and executive function;
(3) language and early literacy;
(4) early mathematics and problem solving;
(5) physical health and motor development; and
(6) communication and relationships;
2026 IN 66—LS 6350/DI 110


aligned to Indiana's existing early learning standards and
kindergarten standards.
SECTION 3. IC 12-17.2-3.8-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) Not later than July 1,
2027, the committee shall establish and publish kindergarten
readiness indicators.
(b) The kindergarten readiness indicators established under
subsection (a) must be neutral with respect to specific curricula,
ideology, or commercial products.
(c) In establishing and publishing the kindergarten readiness
indicators, the committee shall ensure the following:
(1) Indiana's early learning standards and existing definitions
and the indicators are aligned.
(2) The indicators are written in clear, plain language for
families, educators, and caregivers.
(3) The indicators reflect input from early education
providers, kindergarten through grade 3 educators, parents,
employers, and community organizations.
(4) The indicators support and do not conflict with existing
health, development, and early learning rules or guidance
issued by state agencies (as defined in IC 1-1-15-3).
SECTION 4. IC 12-17.2-3.8-6.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.7. (a) The committee shall
publish the kindergarten readiness indicators as follows:
(1) The indicators must be published on a single and easy to
access website page.
(2) The website page described in subdivision (1) must be
entitled "Kindergarten Readiness Roadmap".
(3) The indicators must be available on the website page
described in subdivision (1) as printable one (1) page
summaries that contain the indicators for each of the
following age bands:
(A) Birth through one (1) year of age.
(B) One (1) through two (2) years of age.
(C) Two (2) through three (3) years of age.
(D) Three (3) through four (4) years of age.
(E) Four (4) through five (5) years of age.
(b) The department of education, the office of early childhood
and out of school learning, and the Indiana department of health
shall prominently display a link to the website page described in
2026 IN 66—LS 6350/DI 110


subsection (a) on each of the following:
(1) The department of education's website.
(2) The office of early childhood and out of school learning's
consumer education website page.
(3) On the following of the Indiana department of health's
website:
(A) The maternal and child health website page.
(B) The Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for
Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) website page.
(C) The home visiting website page.
SECTION 5. IC 12-17.2-3.8-6.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.9. In carrying out sections 6.5
and 6.7 of this chapter, the committee and the agencies listed in
section 6.7(b) of this chapter:
(1) may not create new standalone programs or duplicative
materials if existing resources can be updated to reflect the
kindergarten readiness indicators; and
(2) shall, to the extent practicable, do the following:
(A) Use existing:
(i) staff, resources, and technology; and
(ii) applicable federal, state, private, or philanthropic
funds.
(B) Use and adapt, as applicable, existing publications,
digital platforms, and partnerships.
2026 IN 66—LS 6350/DI 110